Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3435
Application for licensure, examination, intern enrollment, certificate of authorization, or emeritus status; form; fees.

(1) Applications for licensure, examination, intern enrollment, a certificate of authorization, or emeritus status shall be made on a form prescribed and furnished by the board. Applications shall be made under oath.

(2) The board may accept the verified information contained in a valid Council Record issued by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards or the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying in lieu of the same information that is required on the form prescribed and furnished by the board.

(3)(a) The board shall establish application and licensure fees as provided in this subsection. All fees are nonrefundable.

(b) The fee for license applications may not exceed three hundred dollars.

(c) The fee for examination applications may be set to recover the costs of examination and its administration.

(d) The fee for intern enrollment may not exceed one hundred dollars.

(e) The certificate of authorization fee for organizations may not exceed three hundred dollars per year.

(f) The fee for emeritus status may not exceed one hundred dollars per year.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 35;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 32.
August 30, 2015